District of Columbia statutes.
38-1948

Repealed

Leave of absence for educational purposes — Compensation of elementary and secondary school teachers.

Repealed.

June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 349, ch. 342, § 3
Aug. 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 584, Pub. L. 88-472, § 1
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 17, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1013.
1973 Ed., § 31-634.